Utah statutes.
70-3a-405.   Forum for actions regarding registration -- Service on out-of-
state registrants.
(1) (a)  An action to require the cancellation of a mark registered under this
chapter shall be brought in a district court of this state.
(b)  The division may not be made a party to an action filed under Subsection
(1)(a), except that the division may intervene in an action filed under
Subsection (1)(a).
(2)  In any action brought against a nonresident registrant, service may be
effected upon the nonresident registrant in accordance with the procedures
established for service upon nonresident corporations and business entities
under Section 16-10a-1511.
